Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 17. Review of Courts-Martial.

§ 33-13-401.
Error of law; lesser included offense.

A finding or sentence of a court-martial may not be held incorrect on the ground of an error of law unless the error materially prejudices the substantial rights of the accused.

Any reviewing authority with the power to approve or affirm a finding of guilty may approve or affirm, instead, so much of the finding as includes a lesser included offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-60; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 60; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 60, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-403.
Initial action on the record.

After trial by court-martial the record shall be forwarded to the convening authority, and action thereon may be taken by the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being, a successor in command, or any officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-61; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 61; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 61, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-405.
General court-martial records.

The convening authority shall refer the record of each general court-martial to his judge advocate who shall submit his written opinion thereon to the convening authority. If the final action of the court has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion shall be limited to questions of jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-62; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 62, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-407.
Reconsideration and revision.

Where there is an apparent error or omission in the record or where the record shows improper or inconsistent action by a court-martial with respect to a finding or sentence which can be rectified without material prejudice to the substantial rights of the accused, the convening authority may return the record to the court for appropriate action. In no case, however, may the record be returned:

For reconsideration of a finding of not guilty, or a ruling which amounts to a finding of not guilty;

For consideration of a finding of not guilty of any charge, unless the record shows a finding of guilty under a specification laid under that charge which sufficiently alleges a violation of some section of this code; or

For increasing the severity of the sentence unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-63; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 63; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-409.
Rehearings.

If the convening authority disapproves the finding and sentence of a court-martial he may, except where there is lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing. In such a case he shall state the reasons for disapproval. If he disapproves the findings and sentence and does not order a hearing, he shall dismiss the charges.

Each rehearing shall take place before a court-martial composed of members not members of the court-martial which first heard the case. Upon a rehearing the accused may not be tried for any offense of which he was found not guilty by the first court-martial, and no sentence in excess of or more severe than the original sentence may be imposed, unless the sentence is based upon a finding of guilty of an offense not considered upon the merits in the original proceedings, or unless the sentence prescribed for the offense is mandatory.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-64; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 64, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-411.
Approval by the convening authority.

In acting on the findings and sentence of a court-martial, the convening authority may approve only such findings of guilty, and the sentence or such part or amount of the sentence, as he finds correct in law and fact and as he in his discretion determines should be approved. Unless he indicates otherwise, approval of the sentence is approval of the findings and sentence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-65; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 65, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-413.
Initial review and disposition of records.

If the convening authority is the Governor, his action on the review of any record of trial is final, subject to review by the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals.

In all other cases not covered by subsection (1) of this section, if the sentence of a special court-martial as approved by the convening authority includes a bad conduct discharge, whether or not suspended, the entire record shall be sent to the appropriate judge advocate of the state military forces concerned to be reviewed in the same manner as a record of trial by general court-martial. The record and the opinion of the judge advocate shall then be sent to the state judge advocate for review.

All other special and summary court-martial records shall be sent to the judge advocate of the appropriate force of the state military forces and shall be acted upon, transmitted, and disposed of as may be prescribed by regulations prescribed by the Governor.

The state judge advocate shall review the record of trial in each case sent to him for review as provided under subsection (2) of this section. If the final action of the court-martial has resulted in an acquittal of all charges and specifications, the opinion of the state judge advocate is limited to questions of jurisdiction.

The state judge advocate shall take final action in any case reviewable by him.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-66; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 66; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 63, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-415.
Review by state judge advocate.

In a case reviewable by the state judge advocate under this section, the state judge advocate may act only with respect to the findings and sentence as approved by the convening authority. He may affirm only such findings of guilty, and the sentence or such part or amount of the sentence, as he finds correct in law and fact and determines, on the basis of the entire record, should be approved. In considering the record, he may weigh the evidence, judge the credibility of witnesses, and determine controverted questions of fact, recognizing that the trial court saw and heard the witnesses. If the state judge advocate set aside the findings and sentence, he may, except where the setting aside is based on lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing. If he sets aside the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, he shall order that the charges be dismissed.

In a case reviewable by the state judge advocate under this or the proceeding section, he shall instruct the convening authority to act in accordance with his decision on the review. If he has ordered a rehearing but the convening authority finds a rehearing impracticable, he may dismiss the charges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-67; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 67; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 64, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-417.
Review by Mississippi Court of Military Appeals.

There is hereby established a Mississippi Court of Military Appeals, located for administrative purposes only in the Mississippi Military Department, State of Mississippi. The court shall consist of five (5) judges appointed by the Adjutant General upon the advice and recommendation of the State Judge Advocate for a term of six (6) years. Initial appointments to this court will be: one (1) judge for a term of two (2) years, two (2) judges for a term of four (4) years, and two (2) judges for a term of six (6) years. The term of office of all successor judges shall be for a six-year period of time, but any judge appointed to fill a vacancy occurring prior to the expiration of the term for which his predecessor was appointed shall be appointed only for the unexpired term of his predecessor. The Adjutant General, upon the advice and recommendation of the State Judge Advocate, shall appoint the chief judge of this court. A person is eligible for appointment to this court who:

Is a member of the bar of the Supreme Court of the State of Mississippi;

Is a member of a federal bar;

Is a commissioned officer of the state military forces, active or retired, or a retired commissioned officer in the reserves of the Armed Forces of the United States of America;

Has been engaged in the active practice of law for at least five (5) years;

Has at least five (5) years’ experience as a staff judge advocate, judge advocate, or legal officer with the state military forces. The requirements in (iv) and (v) of this subsection may be satisfied by equivalent experience or practice in the Armed Forces of the United States.

The court may promulgate its own rules of procedure, provided, however, that a majority of the five (5) judges shall constitute a quorum and the concurrence of a majority of the judges acting on a given case shall be necessary to a decision of the court.

Judges of the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals may be removed by the Adjutant General upon notice and hearing for neglect of duty and malfeasance in office, or for mental or physical disability.

If a judge of the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals is temporarily unable to perform his duties the Adjutant General upon the advice and recommendation of the State Judge Advocate may designate a military judge, as defined in this code, to fill the office for the period of disability.

The judges of the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals, while actually sitting in review of a matter placed under their jurisdiction by the code, and while traveling to and from such sessions, shall be paid compensation equal to that compensation as prescribed for the judges of the circuit courts of the State of Mississippi, to include both salary and travel expenses.

The Mississippi Court of Military Appeals shall have appellate jurisdiction, upon petition of an accused, to hear and review the record in:

All general and special court-martial cases; and

All other cases where a judge of this court has made a determination that there may be a constitutional issue involved.

The accused has sixty (60) calendar days from the time of receipt of actual notice of the final action on his case, under this code, to petition the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals for review, said petition to set forth all errors assigned. The court shall act upon such a petition within sixty (60) calendar days of the receipt thereof. In the event the court fails or refuses to grant such petition for review the final action of the convening authority will be deemed to have been approved; notwithstanding any other provision of this code, upon the court granting a hearing of an appeal, the court may grant a stay or defer service of the sentence of confinement or any other punishment under this code until the court’s final decision upon the case.

In a case reviewable under subsection (2)(a) of this section the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals may act only with respect to the findings and sentence as finally approved and ordered executed by the convening authority. In a case reviewable under subsection (2)(b) of this section this court need take action only with respect to matters of law, and the action of this court is final.

If the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals sets aside the findings and sentence, it may, except where the setting aside is based on lack of sufficient evidence in the record to support the findings, order a rehearing. If it sets aside the findings and sentence and does not order a rehearing, it shall order that the charges be dismissed. After the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals has acted on the case, the record shall be returned to the State Judge Advocate who shall notify the convening authority of the court’s decision. If further action is required the State Judge Advocate shall instruct the convening authority to take action in accordance with that decision. If the court has ordered a rehearing, but the convening authority finds a rehearing impracticable, he may dismiss the charges.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-68; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 68; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 65; Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1989.

§ 33-13-419.
Precedents of other courts.

Decisions of the United States Court of Appeals for the Armed Forces and of the Courts of Review of the Armed Forces of the United States shall be considered persuasive authority but will not be regarded as binding precedent unless adopted as such by the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-69; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 69; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 66; Laws, 2016, ch. 333, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016.

§ 33-13-421.
Appellate counsel.

The counsel and defense counsel of a court-martial shall serve in the capacity of appellate counsel upon an appeal authorized under this code. The accused has the additional right to be represented by civilian counsel at his own expense. Should the defense or trial counsel become unable to perform their duties because of illness or other disability, the convening authority will appoint a qualified trial or defense counsel to continue the proceedings.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-70; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 70; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 67, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-423.
Vacation of suspension.

Before the vacation of the suspension of a special court-martial sentence which as approved includes a dismissal or bad conduct discharge, or of any general court-martial sentence, a hearing on the alleged violation of probation shall be held. The probationer shall be represented at the hearing by military counsel if he so desires.

The record of the hearing and the recommendation of the hearing officer shall be sent for action to the Governor in cases involving a general court-martial sentence and to the commanding officer of the state military forces of which the probationer is a member in all other cases covered by subsection (1) of this section. If the Governor or commanding officer vacates the suspension, any unexecuted part of the sentence except a dismissal shall be executed.

The suspension of any other sentence may be vacated by any authority competent to convene, for the command in which the accused is serving or assigned, a court of the kind that imposed the sentence.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-71; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 71; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 68, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-425.
Petition for a new trial.

At any time within two (2) years after approval by the convening authority of a court-martial sentence, the accused may petition the state judge advocate for a new trial on ground of newly discovered evidence or fraud on the court-martial. If the accused’s case is pending before the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals when this petition is filed, the appeal will not proceed until the state judge advocate has made a decision on the request. If the petition is granted, the appeal will be dismissed. If the petition is denied, the court of military appeals will continue its proceedings on the case.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-72; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 72; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 69, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-427.
Remission or suspension; administrative discharge.

A convening authority may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted part of any sentence, including all uncollected fines.

The Governor may, for good cause, substitute an administrative form of discharge for a discharge or dismissal executed in accordance with the sentence of a court-martial.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-73; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 73; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 70, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-429.
Restoration; administrative discharge.

Under such regulations as the Governor may prescribe, all rights, privileges, and property affected by an executed part of a court-martial sentence which has been set aside or disapproved, except an executed dismissal or discharge, shall be restored unless a new trial or rehearing is ordered and such executed part is included in a sentence imposed upon a new trial or hearing.

If a previously executed sentence of dishonorable discharge is not imposed on a new trial, the Governor shall substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issuance unless the accused is to serve out the remainder of his enlistment.

If a previously executed sentence of dismissal is not imposed on a new trial, the Governor shall substitute therefor a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue, and a commissioned officer dismissed by that sentence may be reappointed by the Governor alone to such commissioned grade and with such rank as in the opinion of the Governor that former officer would have attained had he not been dismissed. The reappointment of such former officer may be made if a position vacancy is available under applicable table of organization. All the time between the dismissal and reappointment shall be considered as service for all purposes.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 71, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-431.
Finality of proceedings, findings, and sentences.

The appellate review of records of trial provided by this code, the proceedings, findings and sentences of court-martial as reviewed and approved, as required by this code, and all dismissals and discharges carried into execution under sentences by court-martial following review and approval as required by this code, are final and conclusive. Orders publishing the proceedings of the court-martial and all action taken pursuant to those proceedings are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies and officers of the state, subject only to action upon a petition for a new trial as provided in Section 33-13-425.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 72, eff from and after July 1, 1981.